Maine, session 132, LD1680.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 5 MRSA §12004-J, sub-§22 is enacted to read:
22.
Transportation Ferry Oversight Committee Legislative Per 23 MRSA
Diem and §4408
Expenses
Sec. 2. 23 MRSA §4408 is enacted to read:
§4408. Ferry Oversight Committee
The Ferry Oversight Committee, established in Title 5, section 12004-J, subsection 22
and referred to in this section as "the committee," is an independent committee and shall
provide continuous oversight of ferry operations and serve as a legislative mechanism for
ensuring accountability and transparency around key decisions that affect unbridged island
communities.
1. Membership. The committee consists of 10 members appointed as follows:
A. One member of the Senate who serves on the joint standing committee of the
Legislature having jurisdiction over transportation matters, appointed by the President
of the Senate;
B. One member of the House of Representatives who serves on the joint standing
committee of the Legislature having jurisdiction over transportation matters, appointed
by the Speaker of the House;
C. Two members of the Maine State Ferry Advisory Board under chapter 411, each of
whom represents an island municipality or plantation served by the Maine State Ferry
Service, appointed by the chair of the Maine State Ferry Advisory Board;
D. Two members who are not members of the Maine State Ferry Advisory Board
under chapter 411, each of whom represents an island municipality or plantation served
by the Maine State Ferry Service, appointed by the Governor; and
E. Four members with expertise in relevant infrastructure, emergency services,
economic development and education, appointed by the Governor.
2. Terms of appointment; vacancies. Members of the committee are appointed for
2-year terms. A member may serve multiple terms. Members of the committee may serve
after the expiration of their terms until their successors have taken office. A member
appointed to fill a vacancy prior to the expiration of the term for which the member's
predecessor was appointed serves only for the remainder of that term and must be appointed
by the same appointing authority. Legislative members serve terms commensurate with
their terms of office.
3. Chair. Annually, the committee shall elect a chair from among its members.
4. Meetings; quorum. The committee may meet as often as necessary but must meet
at least quarterly. A majority of the members constitutes a quorum.
5. Duties. The committee shall:
Page 1 - 132LR2406(01)

A. Review proposals submitted by the Department of Transportation related to ferry
operations, including berthing changes. The committee shall submit a report of a
review under this paragraph to the joint standing committee of the Legislature having
jurisdiction over transportation matters; and
B. Examine the effects of changes in ferry services on student access to education,
emergency service response, service reliability and the economic vitality of island
communities and submit a report by December 31st of each year to the joint standing
committee of the Legislature having jurisdiction over transportation matters with
findings and recommendations.
Sec. 3. Staggered terms. Notwithstanding the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 23,
section 4408, subsection 2, of the initial non-Legislator appointments to the Ferry
Oversight Committee, 4 members must be appointed to one-year terms and 4 members to
2-year terms.